Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 8-2701 to 8-2754 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB778, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB838, § 1.
July 18, 2026